Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2185
Sale of property; notice; procedure.

The same notice of sale shall be given as when lands are sold on execution by the sheriff, and the sale shall be conducted in like manner, except as to place of sale.

R.S.1867, Code § 817, p. 539;

R.S.1913, § 8300;

Laws 1917, c. 142, § 1, p. 328;

C.S.1922, § 9253;

C.S.1929, § 20-2185;

R.S.1943, § 25-2185.

Provisions for sale of property under execution, see sections 25-1527 to 25-1541.

Appraisement is unnecessary. Schick v. Whitcomb, 68 Neb. 784, 94 N.W. 1023 (1903).